District of Columbia statutes.
6-1201

“Old Georgetown” district created.

There is hereby created in the District of Columbia a district known as “Old Georgetown” which is bounded on the east by Rock Creek and Potomac Parkway from the Potomac River to the north boundary of Dumbarton Oaks Park, on the north by the north boundary of Dumbarton Oaks Park, Whitehaven Street and Whitehaven Parkway to 35th Street, south along the middle of 35th Street to Reservoir Road, west along the middle of Reservoir Road to Archbold Parkway, on the west by Archbold Parkway from Reservoir Road to the Potomac River, on the south by the Potomac River to the Rock Creek Parkway.

Sept. 22, 1950, 64 Stat. 903, ch. 984, § 1

History

This section is referenced in § 6-1104, § 6-1105, § 6-1107, § 6-1202, § 10-1121.04, and § 10-1121.11.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 5-1101.
1973 Ed., § 5-801.

Prior Codifications